Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,231
Application to qualified foreign corporations.

(MBCA 17.02) A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state on January 1, 2017, is subject to the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act but is not required to obtain a new certificate of authority to transact business under the act.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 231;

Laws 2015, LB157, § 9.